test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_NoExtra_biitoosijigan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nibiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nibiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nibiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nibiitoosijiganiminiibanan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nibiitoosijiganiminiibanag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nibiitoosijiganiminiibaning
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nibiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nibiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nibiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganiminaanibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganiminaanibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganiminaanibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganimiwaaibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganimiwaaibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganimiwaaibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganiminiibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganiminiibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganiminiibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganiminaanibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganiminaanibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganiminaanibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganimiwaaibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganimiwaaibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganimiwaaibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganiminiibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganiminiibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganiminiibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nibiitoosijiganishinaanibanan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nibiitoosijiganishinaanibanag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibiitoosijiganishinaanibaning
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nibiitoosijiganishiwaaibanan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nibiitoosijiganishiwaaibanag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nibiitoosijiganishiwaaibaning
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nibiitoosijiganishiniibanan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nibiitoosijiganishiniibanag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nibiitoosijiganishiniibaning
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganishinaanibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganishinaanibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganishinaanibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganishiwaaibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganishiwaaibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganishiwaaibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganishiniibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganishiniibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganishiniibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganishinaanibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganishinaanibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganishinaanibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganishiwaaibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganishiwaaibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganishiwaaibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganishiniibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganishiniibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganishiniibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganensimishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganensimishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganenhimishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganenhimishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishinian
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishiniing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishinian
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimish***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimish***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensiminaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensiminaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensiminaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensimiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensimiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensimiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
